Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1112.02
2021 federal notice, defined.

2021 federal notice means the announcement by the Community Development Financial Institutions Fund of the United States Department of the Treasury of allocation awards under a notice of funding availability that was published in the Federal Register in September 2020.

Laws 2021, LB682, § 6.